Washington statutes.
RCW 10.32.070

Noncertified tribes—Persons in custody. (Effective July 1, 2025.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1829-S.SL) ***

Subject to the provisions of RCW 10.32.050, a place of detention shall deliver or make available a person in custody to the noncertified tribe without a judicial order of surrender provided that:

(1) Such person is alleged to have broken the terms of his or her probation, parole, bail, or any other release of the noncertified tribe; and

(2) The place of detention has received from the noncertified tribe an authenticated copy of a prior waiver of extradition signed by such person as a term of his or her probation, parole, bail, or any other release of the noncertified tribe and photographs or fingerprints or other evidence properly identifying the person as the person who signed the waiver.

[ 2024 c 207 s 8.]